Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1450.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1102-C.6 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1102-C.6. Transfer of Tax.--* * *(e) Beginning July 31, 2026, and each July 31 thereafter, the State Treasurer shall transfer an amount equal to ten per cent of the tax collected under this article into the Homebuyer <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021 Rebate Program Fund established under section 1905-L.Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:SECTION 1. THE ACT OF MARCH 4, 1971 (P.L.6, NO.2), KNOWN AS THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971, IS AMENDED BY ADDING AN ARTICLE TO READ:ARTICLE XIX-LHOMEBUYER REBATE PROGRAMSection 1901-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"DEPARTMENT." T HE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE OF THE COMMONWEALTH. "Domicile." As defined in section 501 of the act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), known as The Local Tax Enabling Act."Fund." The Homebuyer Rebate Program Fund established under section 1905-L."Homebuyer Rebate Program." The program established under section 1902-L."Homestead." A dwelling, including the parcel of land on which the dwelling is located and the other improvements located on the parcel for which any of the following apply:(1) The dwelling is primarily used as the domicile of an owner who is a natural person.(2) The dwelling is one of the following:(i) A unit in a condominium as the term is defined in 68 Pa.C.S. § 3103 (relating to definitions) and the unit is primarily used as the domicile of a natural person who is an owner of the unit.(ii) The dwelling is a unit in a cooperative as the 20250HB1450PN2713 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 term is defined in 68 Pa.C.S. § 4103 (relating to definitions) and the unit is primarily used as the domicile of a natural person who is an owner of the unit."Qualified homebuyer." An individual who meets all of the following:(1) Has not either:(i) Previously purchased a home within this Commonwealth.(ii) Purchased a home within this Commonwealth within five years prior to the date of application for the Homebuyer Rebate Program.(1) HAS NOT PREVIOUSLY PURCHASED A HOME.(2) Intends to purchase the home for use as a homestead. (3) IF MARRIED, HAS A SPOUSE WHO HAS NOT COLLECTED A REBATE UNDER SECTION 1904-L."Tax liability." The portion of the realty transfer tax due under Article XI-C for the transfer of the homestead that the qualified homebuyer agreed to pay under a written agreement between the seller of the homestead and the qualified homebuyer.Section 1902-L. Homebuyer Rebate Program.The Homebuyer Rebate Program is established within the Department of Revenue DEPARTMENT . Section 1903-L. Claims.(a) Filing.--Beginning January 1, 2026, a qualified homebuyer may file a claim with the department for a rebate under this section ARTICLE on a form developed by the department. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), the claim shall be filed with the department on or before June 30 of the year next succeeding the end of the calendar year in which the realty transfer tax was due and payable.20250HB1450PN2713 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Exception.--A claim filed after the June 30 deadline until December 31 of a calendar year shall be accepted by the Secretary of Revenue if money is available to pay the benefits to the late-filing claimant.(c) Contents of claim.--Each claim shall include, at a minimum:(1) The size and nature of the homestead being purchased.(2) The amount paid by the claimant for the homestead.(3) The amount of realty transfer tax due under Article XI-C for the transfer of the homestead.(4) Proof of payment of the claimant's tax liability.(5) Reasonable proof of the claimant's status as a qualified homebuyer.(d) Eligibility of claimants.--(1) Only one claimant from a homestead each year shall be entitled to the rebate.(2) If two or more individuals meet the definition of a qualified homebuyer for the same homestead during the same year, the individuals may determine who the claimant shall be.(3) If the individuals are unable to agree, the department shall determine to whom the rebate is to be paid.(e) Approval of claim.--If the department determines that the claimant meets the definition of a qualified homebuyer and has paid the claimant's tax liability, the department shall approve the claim and shall, as soon as practicable, make payment from the fund for the approved claim.(E) APPROVAL OF CLAIM.--(1) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE CLAIMANT MEETS 20250HB1450PN2713 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE DEFINITION OF A QUALIFIED HOMEBUYER AND HAS PAID THE CLAIMANT'S TAX LIABILITY, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE THE CLAIM AND SHALL, AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE, MAKE PAYMENT FOR THE APPROVED CLAIM.(2) THE APPROVAL OF CLAIMS SHALL BE MADE ON A FIRST-COME, FIRST-SERVED BASIS.(3) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF CREDITS APPROVED SHALL NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT SPECIFIED UNDER SECTION 1905-L.Section 1904-L. Amount of rebate.(A) ELIGIBILITY.-- A qualified homebuyer whose claim has been approved under this section ARTICLE is eligible for a rebate of $2,500.Section 1905-L. Homebuyer Rebate Program Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Homebuyer Rebate Program Fund is established in the State Treasury.(b) Amount.--Ten percent of the tax collected under Article XI-C shall be deposited annually into the fund.(c) Use of money.--Money from the fund shall be used to pay claims under this article.(B) REFUND.--IF A QUALIFIED HOMEBUYER WHOSE CLAIM HAS BEEN APPROVED UNDER THIS ARTICLE SELLS THE HOMESTEAD WITHIN FIVE YEARS OF RECEIVING THE REBATE UNDER THIS ARTICLE, THE CLAIMANT SHALL REFUND TO THE DEPARTMENT THE REBATE ON A PRO RATA BASIS.SECTION 1905-L. ALLOCATION.(A) AVAILABILITY OF MONEY.--TEN PERCENT OF THE TAX COLLECTED UNDER ARTICLE XI-C SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE ON AN ANNUAL BASIS TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE.(B) PROCEDURE.--UPON REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER MONEY IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A).20250HB1450PN2713 - 5 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1906-L. Fraudulent claims to obtain benefits.(a) Civil penalty.--In a case in which a claim is excessive and was filed with fraudulent intent, the claim shall be disallowed in full and a penalty of 25% of the amount claimed shall be imposed. The penalty and the amount of the disallowed claim, if the claim has been paid, shall bear interest at the rate of 1.5% per month from the date of the claim until repaid.(b) Criminal penalty.--The claimant and any person who assisted in the preparation or filing of a fraudulent claim commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding $1,000 or to imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both.Section 1907-L. Petition for redetermination.(a) Right to file.--A claimant whose claim is either denied, corrected or otherwise adversely affected by the department may file with the department a petition for redetermination on forms supplied by the department within 90 days after the date of mailing of written notice by the department of the action.(b) Contents.--The petition shall set forth the grounds upon which the claimant alleges that the departmental action is erroneous or unlawful, in whole or part, and shall contain an affidavit or affirmation that the facts contained in the petition are true and correct.(c) Extension of time for filing.--An extension of time for filing the petition may be allowed for cause but may not exceed 120 days.(d) Hearings.--The department shall hold hearings as may be necessary for the purpose of redetermination and each claimant who has duly filed a petition for redetermination shall be notified by the department of the time when and the place where 20250HB1450PN2713 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the hearing for the claimant's case will be held.(e) Time period for decision.--The department shall, within six months after receiving a filed petition for redetermination, dispose of the matters raised by the petition and shall mail notice of the department's decision to the claimant.(f) Review of redetermination.--Within 90 days after the date of official receipt by the claimant of the decision on a petition for redetermination, the claimant who is adversely affected by the decision may by petition request the Board of Finance and Revenue to review the action.Section 1908-L. Review by Board of Finance and Revenue.(a) Right to review.--Within 90 days after the date of official receipt by the claimant of a decision on a petition for redetermination, the claimant who is adversely affected by the decision may by petition request the Board of Finance and Revenue to review the action.(b) No decision.--The failure of the department to officially notify the claimant of a decision within the six-month period under section 1311 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, shall be deemed a denial of the petition and a petition for review may be filed with the Board of Finance and Revenue within 120 days after written notice is officially received by the claimant that the department has failed to dispose of the petition within the six-month period.(c) Contents of petition.--A petition for redetermination shall state the reasons upon which the claimant relies or shall incorporate by reference the petition for redetermination in which the reasons were stated. The petition shall be supported by affidavit that the facts set forth therein are correct and 20250HB1450PN2713 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 true.(d) Time period for decision.--The board shall act in disposition of petitions filed within six months after the petition has been received. In the event of failure of the Board of Finance and Revenue to dispose of a petition within six months, the action taken by the department upon the petition for redetermination shall be deemed sustained.(e) Relief authorized by board.--The Board of Finance and Revenue may sustain the action taken by the department on the petition for redetermination or the board may take other action as deemed necessary and consistent with this article.(f) Form of notice.--Notice of the action of the Board of Finance and Revenue shall be given by mail to the department and to the claimant.SECTION 1907-L. PETITION FOR REDETERMINATION.A CLAIMANT WHOSE CLAIM IS EITHER DENIED, CORRECTED OR OTHERWISE ADVERSELY AFFECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT MAY PETITION THE DEPARTMENT FOR REASSESSMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE XXVII.Section 1909-L 1908-L . Appeal. A claimant aggrieved by a decision of the Board of Finance and Revenue may appeal from the decision of the board in the manner provided by law for appeals from decisions of the board in tax cases.Section 1910-L 1909-L . Report. (a) Duty.--The department shall prepare a report on the Homebuyer Rebate Program.(b) Contents.--The report shall include:(1) A description of the demand for the program.(2) The efforts made by the department to promote the program.20250HB1450PN2713 - 8 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The total number of rebates issued under the program, the average amount of rebate issued and the average amount of realty transfer tax paid by recipients of rebates.(4) An assessment of the effectiveness of the program in meeting the goals of this article.(5) A recommendation as to whether the program should be renewed and, if so, any recommendations for legislation that may improve the effectiveness of the program.(6) Any other information deemed relevant by the department.(c) Submission.--The department shall submit the report to the Governor and the General Assembly on January 31, 2030.Section 1911-L. Regulations.(a) Regulations.--The department shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this article.(b) Guidelines.--The department shall develop written guidelines for the implementation of this article. The guidelines shall be in effect until the department promulgates regulations for the implementation of the provisions of this article.SECTION 1910-L. DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT.THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:(1) INCLUDE NOTIFICATION OF ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS AND APPLICATION MATERIALS ON ANY CURRENT FORMS OR PAPERWORK USED FOR THE COLLECTION OR PAYMENT OF THE TAX UNDER ARTICLE XI-C.(2) DEVELOP WRITTEN GUIDELINES FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION AND ADMINISTRATION OF THIS ARTICLE.Section 1912-L 1911-L . Expiration. This article shall expire December 31, 2030.Section 3 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1450PN2713 - 9 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930